Georgia statutes. TITLE 31 Health
CHAPTER 8 Care and Protection of Indigent and Elderly Patients

Cross references.

Unfair or deceptive practices toward the elderly, §

10-1-850

et seq.

Rights of persons residing in long-term care facilities generally, §

31-8-100

et seq.

Determination of responsibility of patients, counties, departments, and others to pay costs of treatment for mental illness, mental retardation, alcoholism, §§

37-3-121

,

37-4-81

,

37-7-121

and T. 37, C. 9.

Medical assistance generally, §

49-4-140

et seq.

Liability of voluntary health care providers and sponsoring organizations, cumulative immunity, application, §

51-1-29.4

.

Editor’s notes.

By resolution (Ga. L. 1986, p. 526), the General Assembly requested the Governor to create the Task Force on Funding of Indigent Health Care Programs to review laws and programs regarding indigent health care.